Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.  ORS 468A.490 is amended to read:
468A.490. (1) There is established within  the State Treasury a fund known as the Residential
Solid Fuel Heating Air Quality Improvement Fund, separate and distinct from the General Fund.
(2) All moneys appropriated or received [ as gifts or grants for the purposes of this  section ] from
any source, public  or private, for the purpose of reducing the emission of air contaminants
from solid fuel burning devices  shall be credited to  the Residential Solid Fuel Heating Air Quality
Improvement Fund.
(3) The State Treasurer may invest and reinvest the moneys in the fund as provided in ORS
293.701 to 293.857. Interest from the moneys  deposited in the fund and earnings from investment of
the moneys in the fund shall accrue to the fund.
(4) All moneys in the  fund are continuously appropriated to the Department of Environmental
Quality to:
(a) Pay all costs incurred by  the department for evaluating projects and programs, including
projects and programs proposed by local communities or  qualifying organizations, for project man-
agement and oversight of funds awarded for  projects and programs selected in accordance with this
section and for documenting the benefit to air quality from such projects;
(b) Fund  the [ program] programs  established under [ subsection (5) ] subsections (5) and (6)  of
this section;
(c) Fund activities to enhance enforcement of ORS 468A.460 to 468A.515;
(d) Fund public education programs related to compliance with ORS  468A.460 to 468A.515;
[and]
(e) Fund public education programs related to the benefits of  the use of solid fuel burning de-
vices certified pursuant to ORS 468A.460 to 468A.515[ .]; and
(f) Fund programs for replacing or removing solid fuel burning devices that  are not cer-
tified by the department pursuant to ORS 468A.465.
(5) The  department shall use moneys available under subsection (4) of this section to establish
a program designed to reduce the emission of air contaminants by providing  grants, loans , rebates
or other subsidies for  the replacement or removal of solid fuel burning devices that were not certi-
fied by the department pursuant to ORS 468A.465. In addition to any other requirements established
by rules adopted by the Environmental Quality Commission, the program shall provide that:
Enrolled House Bill 2748 (HB 2748-B) Page 1
(a) [All] Forms of new high-efficiency, low  air contaminant-emitting heating systems are allowed,
[except vent-free heating appliances ] as determined by the department ;
(b) Any solid fuel burning device removed under the program must be destroyed;
(c) Any replacement device selected  under the program must be installed in conformance with
building code requirements  and the manufacturer’s specifications including but not limited to vent-
ing specifications; and
(d) To be eligible, program participants  shall participate in any home energy audit program
provided at no charge to the homeowner and shall obtain all information available regarding  subsi-
dies for cost-effective weatherization. The department shall  make the information required in this
subsection readily available to program participants.
(6) The department shall use moneys available under subsection (4) of  this section to
establish a program designed to reduce the emission of air contaminants from solid  fuel
burning devices by providing grants, loans, rebates or other subsidies to  make dry wood or
cleaner fuel available to communities or individuals.
(7) In establishing the programs pursuant to  subsections (5) and (6) of this section, the
department shall prioritize allocating grants, loans, rebates or other subsidies within:
(a) Nonattainment areas in this state that do  not attain compliance with the standards
for particulate matter established by the commission pursuant to ORS 468A.025; and
(b) Areas in this state that the department determines are at substantial risk of being
designated nonattainment areas due to particulate matter emissions.
[(6)] (8) The department may :
(a) Enter into an agreement with a local government or a regional authority in order to imple-
ment the program established under subsection (5) of this section[ .]; and
(b) Enter into an agreement with  a local government in order to implement the program
established under subsection (6) of this section.
SECTION 2.
This 2017 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency  is declared to exist, and this 2017 Act takes effect
July 1, 2017.
Passed by House April 12, 2017
Repassed by House May 11, 2017
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate May 9, 2017
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
..................................................................................
Dennis Richardson, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 2748 (HB 2748-B) Page 2